District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-215.01

Findings.

Repealed.

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-95, § 2, 23 DCR 9532b
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 117(c), 47 DCR 520

History

1981 Ed., § 1-1141.
1973 Ed., § 1-851.

Prior Codifications

Establishment of Department of Human Rights and Minority Business Development: See Mayor’s Order 89-247, November 1, 1989.

Redesignation of the Minority Business Opportunity Commission, the Department of Human Rights and Minority Business Development, and the Minority Business Development Administration: See Mayor’s Order 97-169, September 25, 1997 ( 44 DCR 5863).

Mayor's Orders